Alaska statutes. Title 27. Mining.
Article 1. Legislative Findings and Purpose.

Sec. 27.21.010.
Findings and declaration of purpose.

The legislature finds and declares that

the Congress of the United States has enacted the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, which provides for the establishment of a nationwide program to regulate surface coal mining and reclamation and which vests exclusive authority in the United States Department of the Interior over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation within the United States;

section 101 of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 contains the finding by Congress that because of the diversity in terrain, climate, biology, chemistry, and other physical conditions in areas subject to mining operations, primary governmental responsibility for developing, authorizing, issuing, and enforcing regulations for surface coal mining and reclamation operations subject to that Act should rest with the states;

section 503 of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 provides that each state may assume and retain exclusive jurisdiction over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations in the state by obtaining approval of a state program of regulation that demonstrates that the state has the capability of carrying out the provisions and meeting the purposes of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977;

section 503 of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 provides that a state wishing to assume exclusive jurisdiction over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations in the state must have a state law that provides for the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations in accordance with the requirements of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977; and

because of unique environmental conditions that the state is best equipped to understand, the state intends to assume exclusive jurisdiction over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations in the state under the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977.

The purposes of this chapter are

to prevent the adverse effects to society and the environment resulting from unregulated surface coal mining operations as defined in this chapter and the regulations adopted under it;

to assure that the rights of surface land owners and other persons with an interest in the land are protected from unregulated surface coal mining operations;

to assure that surface coal mining operations are conducted in a manner that will prevent unreasonable degradation of land and water resources;

to assure that surface coal mining operations are not conducted where reclamation required by this chapter and the regulations adopted under it is not feasible;

to assure that reclamation of land on which surface coal mining takes place is accomplished as contemporaneously as practicable with the surface coal mining, recognizing that the responsible extraction of coal by responsible mining operators is an essential and beneficial economic activity;

to assure that appropriate procedures are provided for public participation in the development, revision, and enforcement of regulations, standards, and reclamation plans or programs established under this chapter;

to assure that the coal supply essential to the nation’s energy requirements and to its economic and social well-being is provided and to strike a balance between protection of the environment and other uses of the land and the need for coal as an essential source of energy; and

to promote the reclamation of areas that were mined and left without adequate reclamation before the enactment of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 and that substantially degrade the quality of the environment, prevent the beneficial use of or cause damage to land or water resources, or endanger the health or safety of the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch. 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.010. Renumbered in 1983.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 4, ch. 29, SLA 1982 provides: “RESERVATION CLAUSE. Passage of this Act may not be considered an admission by the State of Alaska of the legality or constitutionality of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, P.L. 95-87, 91 Stat. 447-532, 30 U.S.C. 1201-1328, as amended, and may not be construed to limit, waive, or otherwise affect the right of the State of Alaska, or its agencies, from contesting the constitutional or statutory validity of all or part of a regulation promulgated under the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977.”